Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-1250
Fireworks; prohibited acts; violations; penalties; license suspension, cancellation, or revocation; appeal.

(1) Any person who violates any of the provisions of sections 28-1244 to 28-1249 commits a Class III misdemeanor. If such person is a licensed distributor or jobber, the State Fire Marshal may suspend, cancel, or revoke the license for up to three years. The suspension, cancellation, or revocation shall become effective upon the failure to timely appeal the decision under the Administrative Procedure Act.

(2) It shall be unlawful for any person, association, partnership, limited liability company, or corporation to have in his, her, or its possession any fireworks in violation of any of the provisions of sections 28-1244 to 28-1249. If any person shall have in his, her, or its possession any fireworks in violation of such sections, a warrant may be issued for the seizure of such fireworks and when the warrant is executed by the seizure of such fireworks, such fireworks shall be safely kept by the magistrate to be used as evidence. Upon conviction of the offender, the fireworks shall be destroyed, but if the offender is discharged, the fireworks shall be returned to the person in whose possession they were found. Nothing in such sections shall apply to the transportation of fireworks by regulated carriers.

Laws 1977, LB 38, § 282;

Laws 1993, LB 121, § 183;

Laws 2010, LB880, § 9;

Laws 2024, LB1069, § 1.

Administrative Procedure Act, see section 84-920.